src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PossPX1-NomSg
+Sg+Nom+PxSg1@U.PossPx.Sg1@:%>м0@U.PossPx.Sg1@ K ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg2@U.PossPx.Sg2@:%>тЬ2@U.PossPx.Sg2@ K ;
+Sg+Nom+PxSg3@U.PossPx.Sg3@:%>з%{оэØ%}@U.PossPx.Sg3@ K ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl10@U.PossPx.Pl1@:%>нО1к@U.PossPx.Pl1@ K ;
+Err/Orth+Dial+Sg+Nom+PxPl1@U.PossPx.Pl1@:%>мО1к0@U.PossPx.Pl1@ K ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl2@U.PossPx.Pl2@:%>нк@U.PossPx.Pl2@ K ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl3@U.PossPx.Pl3@:%>ст@U.PossPx.Pl3@ K ;


! This should be checked. Where does it come from?
! 

LEXICON PRON_
+Pron: K ;

!! Demonstrative
LEXICON PRON-IS-DEM_ISTJAMO !! истямо:истя
+Pron+Dem+Dep:мо # ;
+Pron+Dem+Der/MWN:м N_PANGO-Def-Declension ;
+Pron+Dem+Der/MWN:м _PANGO-Indef-Declension ;
+Pron+Dem+Der/MWN:мо N_PANGO-Poss-Declension-CX ;
+Pron+Dem+Der/MWN: NMN_DEF-PL-DECLENSION-TNE2 ;

!! Interrogative
LEXICON PRON-IS-INDEF-MANNER !! 
+Pron+Indef+Manner: # ;

LEXICON PRON-IS-INDEF-PERS-SG-NOM
+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: # ;

!LEXICON PRON-IS-INDEF-PERS-ABL
!+Pron+Indef+SP+Abl: # ;

!LEXICON PRON-IS-INDEF-SPAT-ELA !! What should be done 
!+Pron+Indef+Spat+Ela: # ;

LEXICON PRON-IS-INDEF-SPAT-INE !! What should be done 
+Pron+Indef+Spat+Ine: # ;

LEXICON PRON-IS-INDEF-SPAT-LAT !! What should be done 
+Pron+Indef+Spat+Lat: # ;

!LEXICON PRON-IS-INDEF-SPAT-PRL !! What should be done 
!+Pron+Indef+Spat+Prl: # ;

!LEXICON	PRON-IS-INTERR-MANNER !! кода:кода
!+Pron+Interr+Manner: #  ;

LEXICON	PRON-IS-INTERR-PERS !! ки:ки
+Pron+Interr+Pers+Sg+Nom:е #  ;
+Pron+Interr+Pers: NB-CX-ZERODECLENSIONTYPE-NOCLT  ;

LEXICON DET-INTERR !! кона:кона
!! This is not the same as indefinite
!! PronRel-kona
+Det+Interr: NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
+Det+Interr: _KUDO-Indef-Declension ;
+Det+Interr: N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON PRON-IS-INTERR-SPAT-ELA !! What should be done 
+Pron+Interr+Spat+Ela: # ;

LEXICON PRON-IS-INTERR-SPAT-INE !!= @CODE@ косо 
+Pron+Interr+Spat+Ine: # ;

LEXICON PRON-IS-INTERR-SPAT-LAT !! What should be done 
+Pron+Interr+Spat+Lat: # ;

LEXICON PRON-IS-INTERR-SPAT-PRL !! What should be done 
+Pron+Interr+Spat+Prl: # ;

LEXICON PRON-IS-INTERR-ELA !!= @CODE@ мейстэ
+Pron+Interr+Ela: # ;

LEXICON PRON-IS-INTERR-TEMP !!= @CODE@ зярдо
+Pron+Interr+Temp: # ;

!! Relative pronouns
!LEXICON PRON-IS-REL-ADJ_KODAMO !! кодамо:кода
!+Pron+Rel+Dep:мо # ;

LEXICON	PRON-IS-REL-PERS !! ки:ки
+Pron+Rel+Pers+Sg+Nom:е #  ;
+Pron+Rel+Pers: NB-CX-ZERODECLENSIONTYPE-NOCLT  ;



LEXICON NB-CX-ZERODECLENSIONTYPE-NOCLT
!! ки
+Sg+Nom: #  ;
+Pl+Nom:%>тЬ2 #  ;
+SP+Gen:%>О1нь #  ;
+SP+Ine:%>О1ньсэ #  ;
+SP+Ill:%>О1ньс #  ;
+SP+Ela:%>О1ньстэ #  ;
+SP+Abe:%>втО1мО1 #  ;
+SP+Abl:%>дО1 #  ;
+SP+Tra:%>кс #  ;
+SP+Dat:%>нень #  ;

LEXICON PRON-IS-REL-SEL
!! This is not the same as indefinite
!! PronRel-kona
+Pron+Rel+Sel: NMN_DEF-DECLENSION ;
+Pron+Rel+Sel: _KUDO-Indef-Declension ;
+Pron+Rel+Sel: N_KUDO-Poss-Declension-CX ;


! These have been introduced with the flag: <"@P.INDEF.PREF@">
! There is a counterpart which doesn't take a prefix.
! Only the counterpart is available for post-clitic -Гак
! Or relative pronoun/interrogative pronoun
!
LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-pref
+Der/кой:кой%- Indef_Pronouns ;
+Der/та:та%- Indef_Pronouns ;
+Der/таго:таго%- Indef_Pronouns ;


LEXICON PRON-INDEF-HUM_KI-BUTI
+Pron+Indef+Sem/Hum+Sg+Nom:е INDEF-IN-BUTI ;
+Pron+Indef+Sem/Hum+Sg+Nom: INDEF-IN-BUTI ;
+Pron+Indef+Sem/Hum+Pl+Nom:ть INDEF-IN-BUTI ;
+Pron+Indef+Sem/Hum+SP+Gen:нь INDEF-IN-BUTI ;
+Pron+Indef+Sem/Hum+SP+Abl:де INDEF-IN-BUTI ;

LEXICON PRON-INDEF-ELA
+Pron+Indef+Ela: # ;

LEXICON Indef_Pronouns


!ко+Pron:ко Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
!зяродо+Pron+Interr+Abl:зяродо Indef_Pronouns-K ;
!зяро+Pron+Interr+Ela:зяросто Indef_Pronouns-K ;
ков+Adv+Indef+Lat:ков Indef_Pronouns-K ;
косо+Adv+Indef+Ine:косо Indef_Pronouns-K ;
косто+Adv+Indef+Ela:косто Indef_Pronouns-K ;
кода+Adv+Indef+Manner:кода Indef_Pronouns-K ;
кува+Adv+Indef+Spat+Prl:кува Indef_Pronouns-K ;
зярдо+Adv+Indef+Abl+Temp:зярдо Indef_Pronouns-K ;
зяро+Adv+Indef+Nom:зяро Indef_Pronouns-K ;
зяро+Adv+Indef+Qnt+Mult:зяроксть Indef_Pronouns-K ;
зяро+Adv+Indef+Ill+Temp:зярс Indef_Pronouns-K ;

зярдо+Adv+Indef+Abl+Temp+Gen:зярдонь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
знярдо+Adv+Indef+Abl:знярдо Indef_Pronouns-K ;
зняро+Adv:зняро Indef_Pronouns-K ;

!зняро+Adv+Indef+Ela:зняросто Indef_Pronouns-K ;
зняро+Adv+Indef+Ill:знярс Indef_Pronouns-K ;
знярдо+Adv+Indef+Abl+Gen:знярдонь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
кодамо+A+Indef+Nom+Sg:кодамо Indef_Pronouns-K ;
кодамо+A+Indef+Nom+Pl:кодат Indef_Pronouns-K ;
кодамо+A+Indef+Pl+Nom+Def:кодатнэ Indef_Pronouns-K ;
кона+Det+Indef+Nom+Sg:кона Indef_Pronouns-K ;
мезе+Pron+Indef+Nom+Sg:мезе Indef_Pronouns-K ;
!мезень+Pron+Indef+Interr+Gen:мезень Indef_Pronouns-K ;
мезе+Pron+Indef+Nom+Pl:мезть Indef_Pronouns-K ;
мезе+Pron+Indef+Orth/PhonInfl+Nom+Pl:месть Indef_Pronouns-K ;
мекс+Pron+Indef+Tra:мекс Indef_Pronouns-K ;
!мезе+Pron+Indef+Abl:мезде Indef_Pronouns-K ;
!мезе+Pron+Indef+Dat:мезнень Indef_Pronouns-K ;
!мезе+Pron+Indef+Abl+Def:мезденть Indef_Pronouns-K ;
!мезе+Pron+Indef+Ine:мейсэ Indef_Pronouns-K ;

зняро+Pron:зняро Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;

кодамо+A+Indef+Pl:кодатнэ Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
!кодамо+Adn:кодам Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;

кона+Det:кона _KUDO-Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;

зяро+Adv:зяро _KUDO-Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;

!мезе+Adn+Dep+Gen:мень Indef_Pronouns-K-post ; !This one cannot take prefix
мезе+Pron:мезь _OSH-Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
!мезе+Pron:мезИ3 Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
!мезе+Pron:мейИ3 Indef_Pronouns-Cases ;
!мезе+Pron+Com:мезнек WORD-END ;

LEXICON Indef_Pronouns-Cases
+Pl+Nom:%>VLossтЬ2 Indef_Pronouns-K ; 
+Pl+Nom:%>тЬ2 Indef_Pronouns-K ; 
+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Ill:%>с Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Dat:%>нень Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Abl:%>дО1 Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Ela+Gen:%>ст%{оэØ%}%>нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Abl+Gen:%>дО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Ine+Gen:%>с%{оэØ%}%>нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Gen:%>нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
!2009-09-29!+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Tenses1 ;
+Ill:%>з%{оэØ%} Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Ill:%>з%{оэØ%}нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;

+Nom+Def+Sg:%>сь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Gen+Def+Sg:%>нть Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Def+Sg+Dat:%>нтень Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Def+Nom:%>тне Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Def+Gen:%>тне%>нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Def+Dat:%>тне%>нень Indef_Pronouns-K ;

LEXICON _OSH-Indef_Pronouns-Cases
+Pl+Nom:%>тЬ2 Indef_Pronouns-K ; 
+Ela:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}ст%{оэØ%} Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Ine:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}с%{оэØ%} Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Ill:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}с Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Tra:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}кс Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Dat:%>нень Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Abl:%>дО1 Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Ela+Gen:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}ст%{оэØ%}%>нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Abl+Gen:%>дО1%>нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Ine+Gen:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}с%{оэØ%}%>нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Gen:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Com:%>нек Indef_Pronouns-K ;

+Nom+Def+Sg:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}сь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Gen+Def+Sg:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нть Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Def+Sg+Dat:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нтень Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Def+Nom:%>тне Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Def+Gen:%>тне%>нь Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Def+Dat:%>тне%>нень Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Def+Abl:%>тне%>де Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Def+Ela:%>тне%>стэ Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Def+Ine:%>тне%>сэ Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Def+Ill:%>тне%>с Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Def+Lat:%>тне%>в Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Def+Tra:%>тне%>кс Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Def+Abe:%>тне%>втеме Indef_Pronouns-K ;
+Pl+Def+Cmpr:%>тне%>шка Indef_Pronouns-K ;
