src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
зярдо:зярдо PRON-IS-INTERR-TEMP  "milloin" ;
истямо:истя PRON-IS-DEM_ISTJAMO  "sellainen" ;
кие-бути:ки PRON-INDEF-HUM_KI-BUTI  "joku" ;
та-кода:та-кода PRON-IS-INDEF-MANNER  "" ;
кой-ков:кой-ков PRON-IS-INDEF-SPAT-LAT  "jonnekin" ;
та-ков:та-ков PRON-IS-INDEF-SPAT-LAT  "" ;
та-косо:та-косо PRON-IS-INDEF-SPAT-INE  "" ;
косо-косо:косо-косо PRON-IS-INDEF-SPAT-INE  "" ;
ков:ков PRON-IS-INTERR-SPAT-LAT  "minne" ;
косо:косо PRON-IS-INTERR-SPAT-INE  "missä" ;
кияк:кияк PRON-IS-INDEF-PERS-SG-NOM  "joku" ;
кона:кона PRON-IS-REL-SEL  "joka" ;
кие:ки PRON-IS-INTERR-PERS  "kuka" ;
кие:ки PRON-IS-REL-PERS  "joka" ;
мейстэ:мейстэ PRON-IS-INTERR-ELA  "mistä" ;
мейсэ:мейсэ PRON_  "" ;
